Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 1 General Provisions
37-1-132. Unruly child — Disposition.

If the child is found to be an unruly child, the court may make such disposition as authorized by this section or § 37-1-131(a)(1), (a)(2), (a)(7), or (b) that is best suited to such child's treatment. However, no child found to be an unruly child may be placed on probation under the supervision of the department, unless such child is found to also be a delinquent child or is found to have committed a violation of a valid court order as provided for in the Appendix to the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure. No county government shall be required to increase local funding to implement this provision. The court has the additional dispositional alternative of ordering the department to provide non-custodial services to a child found to be unruly.

An unruly child is eligible for commitment to the department only if:

The child has previously been adjudicated for two (2) or more offenses arising from separate incidents that would constitute an unruly offense, or a felony or misdemeanor if committed by an adult, including adjudications in other jurisdictions that, if committed in this jurisdiction, would constitute a felony or misdemeanor; or

The court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the child is in imminent risk of danger to the child's health or safety and needs specific treatment or services that are available only if the child is placed in the custody of the department;

A child placed in the custody of the department under this subdivision (b)(1)(B) shall remain in custody so long as necessary to complete the treatment or services, which shall be evidence-based and provided by a qualified provider, but shall remain in custody no longer than six (6) months; provided, that the court may order that the child remain in custody for up to an additional six (6) month period if the court finds after a hearing or stipulation that:

The child needs treatment or services that are available only if the child is in custody; and

The treatment or services the child needs are evidence-based and will be provided by a qualified provider.

If the court finds that it is in the best interest of the child and the public that any unruly child be removed from the home of a parent, guardian, or other legal custodian, the placement of the child shall be with the person, agency, or facility that presents the least drastic or restrictive alternative.

Prior to committing an unruly child to the custody of the department of children's services, the court shall refer such child to the department's juvenile-family crisis intervention program under § 37-1-168. The court may commit the child to the department after such juvenile-family crisis intervention program certifies to the court that there is no other less drastic measure than court intervention. Nothing in this subsection (b) shall preclude placing a child in protective service custody.

A disposition under this section shall, in no event, result in the child's detention in shelter care, as defined in § 37-1-116, or other temporary placement, without provision of necessary services consistent with the child's assessments or evaluations, in excess of thirty (30) days after entry of the court's order.

Subject to subdivision (b)(6), an unruly child committed to the custody of the department under subdivision (b)(1)(A) for an indefinite time shall be discharged or placed on home placement supervision after a maximum of six (6) months, excluding any amount of time that a child is absent from placement for whatever reason, unless:

The treatment and rehabilitation of the child require that the child remain in custody beyond six (6) months to complete an evidence-based program in a custodial setting addressing a treatment need identified by the previously administered validated risk and needs assessment;

The child is alleged to have committed a new delinquent act; or

The child is alleged to be an escapee from a secure juvenile facility or institution.

The commissioner shall prescribe procedures whereby the child's treatment, rehabilitation, and progress shall be reviewed monthly and a recommendation for or against home placement or discharge shall be made to the commissioner or the commissioner's designee at least quarterly.

When the department determines that a child who has been committed to the department under this section is ready to return home, the department shall notify the court in writing of its intention to place the child at home on a trial home visit. If the court objects to the trial home visit, it must notify the department of its objection in writing or set a hearing within fifteen (15) days of the date of the notice with such hearing being held at the earliest possible date. If a hearing is not set nor a written objection received within fifteen (15) days of the date of the notice, the department may place the child on a trial home visit. The notice shall include the provision that the department's legal custody of the child shall terminate in thirty (30) days.

If during the thirty-day period the department determines that the trial home visit is not in the child's best interest and removes the child on an emergency basis or seeks to remove the child on a non-emergency basis, the department shall file a motion for review by the court of the trial home visit and shall provide notice to the parent, parents, guardian, or other custodian. The court shall hold a hearing on such motion within three (3) days of an emergency removal and shall set a hearing within fifteen (15) days to be held at the earliest possible date if the motion is for the court's permission to make a non-emergency removal.

During the thirty-day trial home visit, the court may periodically review the child's status and may make any orders that the best interest of the child may require.

A child ordered to probation under subsection (a) may be placed on probation for a maximum period of six (6) months, subject to this subdivision (c)(1). Before expiration of the first six-month period or any extension period thereafter, and after notice and a hearing, the court may extend probation for additional periods not to exceed six (6) months each, but only if the court finds and issues a written order that:

States that it is in the best interest of the child that a condition or conditions of probation remain in effect; and

Specifies the condition or conditions that shall remain in effect and why that continued effectiveness is in the best interest of the child.

If the requirements of subdivision (c)(1) have been met, probation may continue only so long as it is in the best interest of the child that the condition or conditions of probation remain in effect.

If the supervising authority finds the child has violated the conditions or limitations of probation, the supervising authority may file a petition alleging a violation of the conditions or limitations of probation with the court; provided, that the court, in its discretion, may direct the supervising authority that, in some or all circumstances, such a petition should be filed only if the supervising authority makes and documents attempts to address the noncompliant behavior and determines and documents the reasons for which court intervention is needed to address the noncompliance.

If the court finds that no violation has occurred, the child shall be allowed to resume the former conditions of probation or probation may be terminated.

If in a subsequent proceeding, the court finds the child has violated any of the conditions or limitations of probation, the court may modify conditions consistent with the needs of the child, including ordering a transfer or grant pursuant to § 37-1-131(a)(1). The court shall not order a child placed in the custody of the department for a violation of the conditions or limitations of probation unless:

The child is separately adjudicated dependent or neglected and placed pursuant to § 37-1-130;

The child is separately adjudicated delinquent and placed pursuant to § 37-1-131 for an eligible delinquent offense arising out of a subsequent criminal episode other than the offense for which the child has been placed on probation; or

The court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the child is in imminent risk of danger to the child's health or safety and needs specific treatment or services that are available only if the child is placed in the custody of the department;

A child placed in the custody of the department under this subdivision (c)(5)(C) shall remain in custody so long as necessary to complete the treatment or services, which shall be evidence-based and provided by a qualified provider, but shall remain in custody no longer than six (6) months; provided, that the court may order that the child remain in custody for up to an additional six (6) month period if the court finds after a hearing or stipulation that:

The child needs treatment or services that are available only if the child is in custody; and

The treatment or services the child needs are evidence-based and will be provided by a qualified provider.

If a child is adjudicated unruly in whole or in part for habitual and unlawful absence pursuant to §49-6-3007, it is the intent of the general assembly that any disposition of the court be oriented toward family services and those interventions that address educational barriers and the root causes of truancy.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 32; 1979, ch. 289, § 5; 1982, ch. 882, § 2; T.C.A., § 37-232; Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, § 94; 1999, ch. 508, § 8; 2007, ch. 372, § 4; 2018, ch. 1052, §§ 32-35.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 6 provided that any child found to be unruly and placed on probation under the supervision of the division of juvenile probation (now department of children's services) prior to April 1, 1986, and remaining on such probation on that date, was deemed to be on probation under the supervision of the probation officer of the court.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment by ch. 1052, § 35, effective July 1, 2018, added (d).

The 2018 amendment by ch. 1052, §§ 32-34, effective July 1, 2019, in (a), substituted “this section or §37-1-131(a)(1), (a)(2), (a)(7), or (b)” for “§§37-1-131(a)(1), (2), (5), or (7)” following “authorized by” and substituted “shall” for “may” following “government”; added present (b)(1) and redesignated former (b)(1) through (b)(3) as present (b)(2) through (b)(4); in present (b)(3), substituted “Prior to committing” for “If the court desires to commit” at the beginning, “the court shall” for “it shall, prior to ordering commitment” preceding “refer”, and “subsection (b)” for “subdivision (b)(2)” preceding “shall preclude”; and added (b)(5) through (b)(7); rewrote (c)(1) through (c)(3) which read:“(c)(1) When the department determines that a child who has been committed to the department under this section is ready to return home, the department shall notify the court in writing of its intention to place the child at home on a trial home visit. If the court objects to the trial home visit, it must notify the department of its objection in writing or set a hearing within fifteen (15) days of the date of the notice with such hearing being held at the earliest possible date. If a hearing is not set nor a written objection received within fifteen (15) days of the date of the notice, the department may place the child on a trial home visit. The notice shall include the provision that the department's legal custody of the child shall terminate in thirty (30) days.“(2) If during the thirty-day period the department determines that the trial home visit is not in the child's best interest and removes the child on an emergency basis or seeks to remove the child on a non-emergency basis, the department shall file a motion for review by the court of the trial home visit and shall provide notice to the parent(s), guardian or other custodian. The court shall hold a hearing on such motion within three (3) days of an emergency removal and shall set a hearing within fifteen (15) days to be held at the earliest possible date if the motion seeks the court's permission to make a non-emergency removal.“(3) During the thirty-day trial home visit, the court may periodically review the child's status and may make any orders that the best interest of the child may require.”; and added (c)(4) through (c)(6).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; July 1, 2019; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect May 21, 2018.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rule 13 of the Rules of the Supreme Court of Tennessee.

This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rules 6 and 32 and in the text of Rule 32 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Minors, § 35.

Law Reviews.

Rules of Procedure for Courts with Juvenile Jurisdiction in Tennessee (R.B.J. Campbelle, Jr.), 18 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 20 (1982).

Attorney General Opinions. Order removing child from home county and enjoining return, OAG 99-007 (1/25/99).

Truancy enforcement — private and church-related schools, OAG 00-006 (1/11/00).

37-1-133. Order of adjudication — Noncriminal.

An order of disposition or other adjudication in a proceeding under this part is not a conviction of crime and does not impose any civil disability ordinarily resulting from a conviction or operate to disqualify the child in any state service or civil service application or appointment. A child shall not be committed or transferred to a penal institution or other facility used primarily for the execution of sentences of persons convicted of a crime, except as provided in § 37-1-134.

The disposition of a child and evidence adduced in a hearing in juvenile court may not be used against such child in any proceeding in any court other than a juvenile court, whether before or after reaching majority, except in dispositional proceedings after conviction of a felony for the purposes of a pre-sentence investigation and report.

A child found to be delinquent shall be exempt from the operation of laws applicable to infamous crimes, and such child shall not be rendered infamous by the judgment of the juvenile court in which such child is tried.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 33; T.C.A., § 37-233; Acts 2012, ch. 800, § 49.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 800, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subsection (a), shall be known and cited as the “Tennessee Excellence, Accountability, and Management (T.E.A.M.) Act of 2012.”

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 609 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 25 Tenn. Juris., Witnesses, § 37.1.

Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), Rule 609.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Supreme Court's Approval of Selected Federal Rules of Evidence (Donald F. Paine), 23 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 17 (1987).

37-1-134. Transfer from juvenile court.

After a petition has been filed alleging delinquency based on conduct that is designated a crime or public offense under the laws, including local ordinances, of this state, the court, before hearing the petition on the merits, may transfer the child to the sheriff of the county to be held according to law and to be dealt with as an adult in the criminal court of competent jurisdiction. The disposition of the child shall be as if the child were an adult if:

The child was:

Less than fourteen (14) years of age at the time of the alleged conduct and charged with first degree murder or second degree murder or attempted first or second degree murder;

Fourteen (14) years of age or more but less than seventeen (17) years of age at the time of the alleged conduct and charged with the offense of first degree murder, second degree murder, rape, aggravated rape, rape of a child, aggravated rape of a child, aggravated robbery, especially aggravated robbery, aggravated burglary, especially aggravated burglary, kidnapping, aggravated kidnapping, especially aggravated kidnapping, commission of an act of terrorism, carjacking, or an attempt to commit any such offenses;

Sixteen (16) years of age or more at the time of the alleged conduct and charged with the offense of robbery or attempt to commit robbery; or

Seventeen (17) years of age or more at the time of the alleged conduct;

The district attorney general shall not seek, nor shall any child transferred under this section receive, a sentence of death for the offense for which the child was transferred;

A hearing on whether the transfer should be made is held in conformity with §§ 37-1-124, 37-1-126 and 37-1-127;

Reasonable notice in writing of the time, place and purpose of the hearing is given to the child and the child's parents, guardian or other custodian at least fourteen (14) days prior to the hearing; and

The court finds that there is probable cause to believe that:

The child committed the delinquent act as alleged;

The child is not committable to an institution for the developmentally disabled or mentally ill; and

The interests of the community require that the child be put under legal restraint or discipline.

In making the determination required by subsection (a), the court shall consider, among other matters:

The extent and nature of the child's prior delinquency records;

The nature of past treatment efforts and the nature of the child's response thereto;

Whether the offense was against person or property, with greater weight in favor of transfer given to offenses against the person;

Whether the offense was committed in an aggressive and premeditated manner;

The possible rehabilitation of the child by use of procedures, services and facilities currently available to the court in this state; and

Whether the child's conduct would be a criminal gang offense, as defined in § 40-35-121, if committed by an adult.

The transfer pursuant to subsection (a) terminates jurisdiction of the juvenile court with respect to any and all delinquent acts with which the child may then or thereafter be charged, and the child shall thereafter be dealt with as an adult as to all pending and subsequent criminal charges; provided, that if a child transferred pursuant to this section is acquitted in criminal court on the charge or charges resulting in such transfer, or if such charge or charges are dismissed in such court, this subsection (c) shall not apply and the juvenile court shall retain jurisdiction over such child. If a child is in the legal custody of the department at the time of transfer, such custody shall terminate at the transfer hearing, except that if a child is already committed to the department, the court may determine if it is in the best interest of the child to remain in the legal custody of the department until conviction occurs. In any case, legal custody by the department shall terminate upon any conviction in adult criminal court. If there is no conviction and charges so transferred are dismissed or acquittal occurs, the presiding trial judge shall notify the transferring juvenile court judge of such dismissal or acquittal so that the juvenile court may at its discretion set a hearing to ascertain status of the child as to the department's custody.

If a person eighteen (18) years of age or older is to be charged with an offense that was alleged to have been committed prior to such person's eighteenth birthday, the petition shall be brought in the juvenile court that would have had jurisdiction at the time of the offense. The juvenile court shall either adjudicate the case under its continuing jurisdiction authority under § 37-1-102(b)(5)(B) and (C) or undertake transfer proceedings consistent with this section.

No child, either before or after reaching eighteen (18) years of age, shall be prosecuted for an offense previously committed unless the case has been transferred as provided in subsection (a).

Statements made by the child at the juvenile court hearing under this section are not admissible against the child, over objection, in the criminal proceedings following the transfer.

In any county in which, on July 1, 1996, the general sessions court or juvenile court makes audio recordings, the court shall make or cause to be made an audio recording of each transfer hearing conducted pursuant to this section. Such recording shall include all proceedings in open court and such other proceedings as the judge may direct and shall be preserved as a part of the record of the hearing. The juvenile who is the subject of the hearing may, at the juvenile's own expense, transcribe the recording of the hearing and a transcript so prepared may be used for the purpose of an appeal as provided by law. In all other counties, transfer hearings shall be recorded using the procedure provided in title 40, chapter 14, part 3.

If the case is not transferred, the judge who conducted the hearing shall not over objection of an interested party preside at the hearing on the petition. If the case is transferred to a court of which the judge who conducted the hearing is also the judge, the judge likewise is disqualified from presiding in the prosecution.

After a child has been sentenced to an adult institution, the department of correction may file a petition requesting the committing court to allow the department to transfer the defendant to an institution for juvenile delinquents administered by the department of children's services. Upon the approval by such court, the defendant may be transferred by the department of correction to a child-caring institution to be held until the defendant's eighteenth birthday. At the defendant's eighteenth birthday, the defendant may be transferred to an adult institution if there is time remaining on the defendant's term. If the term expires prior to the eighteenth birthday, the defendant shall be released. Any child sentenced by a committing court pursuant to this section shall, for the purpose of parole, be treated as if such child were an adult. The provisions of this section relative to housing of juveniles who have obtained the age of eighteen (18) shall not be affected by subsections (i), (j) and (k).

When a child transferred under this section is detained, the juvenile court may, in its discretion, order confinement in a local juvenile detention facility, or a juvenile detention facility with which it contracts or an adult detention facility separate and removed from adult detainees. The court having adult criminal jurisdiction may thereafter order detention in an adult detention facility separate and removed from adult detainees; provided, however, that during the period while such child is detained separately from adult detainees, such child shall otherwise abide by the same regulations and policies governing conditions of imprisonment that apply to adult detainees who are charged with similar offenses. Similar regulations and policies governing educational opportunities for adults shall be implemented for a child so detained, but such regulations and policies shall in no way affect or alter the manner in which a local education agency is required to provide educational services to a child under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, compiled in 20 U.S.C. § 1471 et seq.

Any person, who was transferred under this section and who was less than sixteen (16) years of age at the time of the offense and who is subsequently convicted and committed, shall be housed in a juvenile correctional facility until such person reaches sixteen (16) years of age, at which time such person may be transferred upon the order of the committing court to an adult facility. Any person committed to an adult facility under this section shall be housed separate and removed from adult inmates. In exercising the commissioner's discretion under § 41-1-403 to determine the institutional location of any such person, the commissioner of correction shall take into consideration the proximity of the institution to the person's home. However, during any period while such person is confined separately from adult inmates within such regional facility, such person shall otherwise abide by the same regulations and policies governing conditions of imprisonment that apply to adult inmates who are confined for similar offenses. Similar regulations and policies governing educational opportunities for adults shall be implemented for a child so detained, but such regulations and policies shall in no way affect or alter the manner in which a local education agency is required to provide educational services to a child under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, compiled in 20 U.S.C. § 1471 et seq.

Any person who is transferred under this section and who was sixteen (16) years of age or older at the time of the offense and is subsequently convicted and committed shall be housed in a juvenile correctional facility unless the committing court orders commitment to an adult facility. Any person committed to an adult facility under this section shall be housed, separate and removed from adult inmates. In exercising the commissioner's discretion under § 41-1-403 to determine the institutional location of any such person, the commissioner of correction shall take into consideration the proximity of the institution to the person's home. However, during any period while such person is confined separately from adult inmates within such regional facility, such person shall otherwise abide by the same regulations and policies governing conditions of imprisonment that apply to adult inmates who are confined for similar offenses. Similar regulations and policies governing educational opportunities for adults shall be implemented for a child so detained, but such regulations and policies shall in no way affect or alter the manner in which a local education agency is required to provide educational services to a child under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, compiled in 20 U.S.C. § 1471 et seq.

It is the intent of the general assembly that children shall not be transferred under this section due to a lack of appropriate resources for effective treatment and rehabilitation in the juvenile justice system.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 34; 1975, ch. 296, § 1; 1976, ch. 745, § 2; 1980, ch. 838, §§ 1, 2; Acts 1982, ch. 637, §§ 1-4; T.C.A., § 37-234; Acts 1989, ch. 278, § 39; 1990, ch. 958, § 1; 1990, ch. 982, § 2; 1994, ch. 823, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 895, §§ 1, 2; 1995, ch. 267, § 1; 1995, ch. 354, §§ 1-3; 1995, ch. 379, § 1; 1996, ch. 767, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 73, 95; 1998, ch. 782, § 1; imp. am. Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2005, ch. 265, § 2; 2010, ch. 860, § 1; 2011, ch. 486, §§ 2, 3; 2016, ch. 600, §§ 5, 6; 2017, ch. 382, § 1; 2018, ch. 1052, §§ 36, 37.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1994, ch. 823, § 3 provided that this section applies only to offenses committed on or after July 1, 1994.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment substituted “fourteen (14) days” for “three (3) days” in (a)(3); and substituted “is probable cause” for “are reasonable grounds” in the introductory language of (a)(4).

The 2017 amendment, in (a)(2), substituted “aggravated kidnapping,” for “aggravated kidnapping or” following the first occurrence of “kidnapping” and inserted “, commission of an act of terrorism,” preceding “or an attempt”.

The 2018 amendment redesignated (a)(1) as (a)(1)(A) and (a)(1)(B); in the present introductory language of (a)(1)(A), substituted the colon for “sixteen (16)”; in (a)(1)(A)(i), substituted “Less than fourteen (14) years of age” for “years or more of age” and “, and charged with first degree murder or second degree murder or attempted first or second degree murder;” for “or the child was less than sixteen (16)” following “conduct”; in present (a)(ii), substituted “Fourteen (14) years of age or more but less than seventeen (17) years of age at the time of the alleged conduct and” for “years of age if such child was” preceding “charged”, inserted “aggravated burglary, especially aggravated burglary,” and “carjacking”; added (a)(1)(A)(iii) and (a)(1)(A)(iv); in present (a)(1)(B), twice substituted “shall” for “may”; and added (l).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 600, § 17. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 382, § 2. May 18, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect May 21, 2018.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the text and Advisory Commission Comments of Rule 24 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 8.4, 8.6, 8.7, 8.8, 8.9, 8.11, 8.13, 8.14, 8.15, 8.16, 8.41, 16.56, 16.109.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 27; 18 Tenn. Juris., Minors, § 11.

Law Reviews.

A Noble Ideal Whose Time Has Come (Penny J. White), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 223 (1989).

Blended Sentencing in Tennessee Courts, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 767 (2014).

Success in Shelby County: A Roadmap to Systemic Juvenile Reform, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 727 (2014).

The DOJ Comes to Town: An Argument for Legislative Reform When the Juvenile Court Fails to Protect Due Process Rights, 44 U. Mem. L. Rev. 921 (2014).

Attorney General Opinions. Detention of juveniles transferred to criminal court to be dealt with as adults, OAG 05-121 (7/29/05).

37-1-135. Mentally ill or developmentally disabled child — Disposition.

If, at a dispositional hearing or at a hearing to transfer a child under §37-1-134, there is reason to believe the child may be suffering from mental illness or is developmentally disabled, the court may proceed under §37-1-128(d).

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 35; 1973, ch. 127, § 17; 1980, ch. 639, § 2; T.C.A., § 37-235; Acts 1985, ch. 437, § 32; 1986, ch. 836, § 2; imp. am. Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 6.

Cross-References. Rehabilitation of inmates with mental illness or intellectual disabilities, §33-5-301.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in Rules 32 and 38 of the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 8.1.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court System — Chancery Court (Frederic S. Le Clercq), 8 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 281 (1977).

37-1-136. Assessment reports in certain counties — Confidentiality — Limited access — Destruction.

All reports and materials compiled by the juvenile court in connection with an assessment report shall be confidential, shall not be public record, and shall not be disclosed, except as specifically authorized by this section. Except for purposes directly connected with this section, a person shall not disclose, receive, make use of, authorize, or knowingly permit the use of assessment reports and related materials. Assessment reports and related materials shall not be subject to any court subpoena.

Access to assessment reports and materials shall be granted to the following people, officials, or agencies only for the following limited purposes:

A court official or employee for the purpose of compiling information, administering assessment tools, preparing reports, and assisting children and families with accessing identified services and programs. The court official or employee may disclose relevant information, but not the actual assessment reports or materials, to professionals or other agency providers as needed to assist the child and family in accessing services and programs;

An attorney for the child to use in representing the child or a guardian ad litem for the child for use in representing the child's best interests; or

The child who is the subject of the assessment report and the child's parent or legal guardian.

A juvenile court judge, magistrate, or district attorney general may be provided with a limited report concerning a child adjudicated delinquent. The limited report may contain service recommendations developed from the assessment report for the purpose of reviewing the appropriateness of the recommendations.

A juvenile court judge or magistrate may hear testimony regarding the contents of an assessment report in a delinquency case for a child adjudicated delinquent for the limited purpose of determining appropriate services and programs for the child who is the subject of the assessment report. If such testimony is introduced, the actual assessment report and materials shall not be submitted to the court and shall not become part of the court record.

The materials, records, and assessment reports compiled by the juvenile court for use as discussed in this section are to be maintained separately from public court records. When a child who is the subject of such an assessment report reaches an age when they are no longer under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, the assessment report and all materials used to compile the information in the assessment report in possession of the juvenile court shall be destroyed.

A violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

As used in this section, “assessment report” means a report compiled by the juvenile court assessment team.

This section shall apply to any assessment report or materials used in the creation of an assessment report in juvenile courts located in any county having a metropolitan form of government with a population of more than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and this section may be adopted by the juvenile court in any county and applied to any assessment report or materials used in the creation of an assessment report in juvenile court.

Acts 2016, ch. 833, § 1; 2018, ch. 1052, § 38.

Compiler's Notes. Former §37-1-136 (Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 36; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; 1977, ch. 482, § 5; T.C.A., § 37-236), concerning disposition of abandoned children, was repealed by Acts 1995, ch. 532, § 11, effective January 1, 1996. For present related provisions, see §36-1-113.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment, in (h), substituted “apply” for “be limited in application” following “shall” and added “, and this section may be adopted by the juvenile court in any county and applied to any assessment report or materials used in the creation of an assessment report in juvenile court”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 833, § 2. April 21, 2016.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect May 21, 2018.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.